Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:(1) The parole reinstitution work group is established. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following members:(a) A representative of the board;(b) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;(c) A representative of the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;(d) A representative of the Washington state superior court judges' association;(e) Three members representing victim advocates;(f) At least three individuals appointed in accordance with RCW 43.18A.020; and(g) A representative of the department.(2) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the William D. Ruckelshaus center.(3) The work group shall:(a) Make recommendations on a coordinated and comprehensive approach to reinstituting parole in Washington; and(b) Develop criteria for parole eligibility.(4) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2027.(5) The work group is subject to the reporting requirements in RCW 43.18A.030.(6) This section expires December 31, 2027.--- END ---